Washington statutes.
RCW 17.28.100

Election on proposition to levy tax.

At the same election there shall be submitted to the voters residing within the district, for their approval or rejection, a proposition authorizing the mosquito control district, if formed, to levy at the earliest time permitted by law on all taxable property located within the mosquito control district a general tax, for one year, of up to twenty-five cents per thousand dollars of assessed value in excess of any constitutional or statutory limitation for authorized purposes of the mosquito control district. The proposition shall be expressed on the ballots in substantially the following form:

"ONE YEAR . . . . . . CENTS PER THOUSAND

DOLLARS OF ASSESSED VALUE LEVY

Shall the mosquito control district, if formed, levy a general tax of . . . . . . cents per thousand dollars of assessed value for one year upon all the taxable property within said district in excess of the constitutional and/or statutory tax limits for authorized purposes of the district?

YES

. . . .

□

NO

. . . .

□"

Such proposition to be effective must be approved by a majority of at least three-fifths of the persons voting on the proposition to levy such tax in the manner set forth in Article VII, section 2(a) of the Constitution of this state, as amended by Amendment 59 and as thereafter amended.

[ 1982 c 217 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 195 s 2; 1957 c 153 s 10.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective dates and termination dates—Construction—1973 1st ex.s. c 195: See notes following RCW 84.52.043.